California, session 20252026, SB1318.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30604 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30604. (a) Before certification of the local coastal program, a coastal development permit shall be issued if the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, finds that the proposed development is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) and that the permitted development will not prejudice the ability of the local government to prepare a local coastal program that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200). A denial of a coastal development permit on grounds it would prejudice the ability of the local government to prepare a local coastal program that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) shall be accompanied by a specific finding that sets forth the basis for that conclusion.(b) After certification of the local coastal program, a coastal development permit shall be issued if the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, finds that the proposed development is in conformity with the certified local coastal program.(c) Every coastal development permit issued for any development between the nearest public road and the sea or the shoreline of any body of water located within the coastal zone shall include a specific finding that the development is in conformity with the public access and public recreation policies of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200).(d) A development or any portion of a development that is outside the coastal zone shall not be subject to the coastal development permit requirements of this division, nor shall anything in this division authorize the denial of a coastal development permit by the commission on the grounds the proposed development within the coastal zone will have an adverse environmental effect outside the coastal zone.(e) A coastal development permit shall not be denied under this division on the grounds that a public agency is planning or contemplating to acquire the property, or property adjacent to the property, on which the proposed development is to be located, unless the public agency has been specifically authorized to acquire the property and there are funds available, or funds that could reasonably be expected to be made available within one year, for the acquisition. If a permit has been denied for that reason and the property has not been acquired by a public agency within a reasonable period of time, a permit shall not be denied for the development on grounds that the property, or adjacent property, is to be acquired by a public agency when the application for that development is resubmitted.(f) The commission shall encourage housing opportunities for persons of low and moderate income. In reviewing residential development applications for low- and moderate-income housing, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code, the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, shall not require measures that reduce residential densities below the density sought by an applicant if the density sought is within the permitted density or range of density established by local zoning plus the additional density permitted under Section 65915 of the Government Code, unless the issuing agency or the commission on appeal makes a finding, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the density sought by the applicant cannot feasibly be accommodated on the site in a manner that is in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30200) or the certified local coastal program.(g) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that it is important for the commission to encourage the protection of existing and the provision of new affordable housing opportunities for persons of low and moderate income in the coastal zone.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide guidance to the commission on the standards of review to consider when approving, approving with modifications, or disapproving a coastal development permit or local coastal program amendment submitted by a local government for non-owner-occupied short-term rentals to establish a reasonable balance between protecting public access to the coast and the goals of the state to address affordability, housing, and equity. (2)The commission(3) Notwithstanding Sections 30210, 30213, and 30222, the commission shall approve a coastal development permit or local coastal program amendment submitted by a local government restricting or prohibiting non-owner-occupied short-term rentals, regardless of the availability of other visitor-serving accommodations to meet demand. demand, if the local agency made findings that it was necessary to address significant local housing needs and the commission determines that the permit or amendment strikes a reasonable balance between local housing needs and public access to the coast.(h) When acting on a coastal development permit, the issuing agency, or the commission on appeal, may consider environmental justice, or the equitable distribution of environmental benefits throughout the state.